Illinois, session 104th, SB3049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Newborn Metabolic Screening Act is amended 5by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 240/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4904)7    Sec. 2. General provisions. The Department of Public 8Health shall administer the provisions of this Act and shall:9    (a) Institute and carry on an intensive educational 10program among physicians, hospitals, public health nurses, and 11the public concerning disorders included in newborn screening. 12This educational program shall include information about the 13nature of the diseases and examinations for the detection of 14the diseases in early infancy in order that measures may be 15taken to prevent the disabilities resulting from the diseases.16    (a-5) Require that all newborns be screened for the 17presence of certain genetic, metabolic, and congenital 18anomalies as determined by the Department, by rule.19    (a-5.1) Require that all blood and biological specimens 20collected pursuant to this Act or the rules adopted under this 21Act be submitted for testing to the nearest Department 22laboratory designated to perform such tests. The following 23provisions shall apply concerning testing:  SB3049 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1        (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, the base fee for newborn 2    screening services shall be $118. The Department may 3    develop a reasonable fee structure and may levy additional 4    fees according to such structure to cover the cost of 5    providing this testing service and for the follow-up of 6    infants with an abnormal screening test; however, 7    additional fees may be levied no sooner than 6 months 8    prior to the beginning of testing for a new genetic, 9    metabolic, or congenital disorder. Fees collected from the 10    provision of this testing service shall be placed in the 11    Metabolic Screening and Treatment Fund. Other State and 12    federal funds for expenses related to metabolic screening, 13    follow-up, and treatment programs may also be placed in 14    the Fund.15        (2) Moneys shall be appropriated from the Fund to the 16    Department solely for the purposes of providing newborn 17    screening, follow-up, and treatment programs. Nothing in 18    this Act shall be construed to prohibit any licensed 19    medical facility from collecting additional specimens for 20    testing for metabolic or neonatal diseases or any other 21    diseases or conditions, as it deems fit. Any person 22    violating the provisions of this subsection (a-5.1) is 23    guilty of a petty offense.24        (3) If the Department is unable to provide the 25    screening using the State Laboratory, it shall temporarily 26    provide such screening through an accredited laboratory   SB3049 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1    selected by the Department until the Department has the 2    capacity to provide screening through the State 3    Laboratory. If screening is provided on a temporary basis 4    through an accredited laboratory, the Department shall 5    substitute the fee charged by the accredited laboratory, 6    plus a 5% surcharge for documentation and handling, for 7    the fee authorized in this subsection (a-5.1).8    (a-5.2) Maintain a registry of cases, including 9information of importance for the purpose of follow-up 10services to assess long-term outcomes. 11    (a-5.3) Supply the necessary metabolic treatment formulas 12where practicable for diagnosed cases of amino acid metabolism 13disorders, including phenylketonuria, organic acid disorders, 14and fatty acid oxidation disorders for as long as medically 15indicated, when the product is not available through other 16State agencies.17    (a-5.4) Arrange for or provide public health nursing, 18nutrition, and social services and clinical consultation as 19indicated.20    (a-5.5) Utilize the Universal Newborn Screening Genetic 21and Metabolic Diseases Advisory Committee established under 22the Genetic and Metabolic Diseases Advisory Committee Act to 23provide guidance and recommendations to the Department's 24newborn screening program. The Universal Newborn Screening 25Genetic and Metabolic Diseases Advisory Committee shall review 26the feasibility and advisability of including additional   SB3049 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1metabolic, genetic, and congenital disorders in the newborn 2screening panel, according to a review protocol applied to 3each suggested addition to the screening panel. Beginning 4January 1, 2027, the Universal Newborn Screening Advisory 5Committee shall review all new conditions added to the federal 6Recommended Uniform Screening Panel within 12 months of the 7condition being added to the Recommended Uniform Screening 8Panel, as long as the condition meets the requirements of this 9Section. If the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel includes 10conditions not screened by the State on the effective date of 11this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 12Universal Newborn Screening Advisory Committee shall begin 13review of the condition no later than one year after the 14effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15Assembly. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 16prevent the review and recommendation of additional conditions 17not on the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel on the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19Assembly, as long as they meet the requirements for review. 20The Department shall consider the recommendations of the 21Universal Newborn Screening Genetic and Metabolic Diseases 22Advisory Committee in determining whether to include an 23additional disorder in the screening panel prior to proposing 24an administrative rule concerning inclusion of an additional 25disorder in the newborn screening panel. Notwithstanding any 26other provision of law, no new screening may begin prior to the   SB3049 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1occurrence of all the following:2        (1) the establishment and verification of relevant and 3    appropriate performance specifications as defined under 4    the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and 5    regulations thereunder for U.S. Food and Drug 6    Administration-cleared or in-house developed methods, 7    performed under an institutional review board-approved 8    protocol, if required;9        (2) the availability of quality assurance testing 10    methodology for the processes set forth in item (1) of 11    this subsection (a-5.5);12        (3) the acquisition and installment by the Department 13    of the equipment necessary to implement the screening 14    tests;15        (4) the establishment of precise threshold values 16    ensuring defined disorder identification for each 17    screening test;18        (5) the authentication of pilot testing achieving each 19    milestone described in items (1) through (4) of this 20    subsection (a-5.5) for each disorder screening test; and21        (6) the authentication of achieving the potential of 22    high throughput standards for statewide volume of each 23    disorder screening test concomitant with each milestone 24    described in items (1) through (4) of this subsection 25    (a-5.5). 26    (a-6) (Blank).  SB3049 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1    (a-7) (Blank).2    (a-8) (Blank).3    (b) (Blank).4    (c) (Blank).5    (d) (Blank).6    (e) (Blank).7(Source: P.A. 98-440, eff. 8-16-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14; 899-403, eff. 8-19-15.) 9    Section 10. The Genetic and Metabolic Diseases Advisory 10Committee Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 11    (410 ILCS 265/5)12    Sec. 5. Universal Newborn Screening Genetic and Metabolic 13Diseases Advisory Committee. 14    (a) The Director of Public Health shall create the 15Universal Newborn Screening Genetic and Metabolic Diseases 16Advisory Committee to advise the Department of Public Health 17regarding issues relevant to newborn screenings of metabolic 18diseases.19    (b) The Universal Newborn Screening Advisory Committee 20shall purposes of Metabolic Diseases Advisory Committee are 21all of the following:22        (1) Conduct reviews of any condition added to the 23    federal Recommended Uniform Screening Panel pursuant to 24    Section 2 of the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act within   SB3049 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1    one year of addition to the Recommended Uniform Screening 2    Panel.3        (2) Conduct reviews within one year of any condition 4    that meets the following criteria once both criteria have 5    been met:6            (A) there is a newborn screening assay available 7        for the condition; and8            (B) there is a therapeutic intervention or 9        treatment approved by the United States Food and Drug 10        Administration for the condition.11        (3) Following review of each condition, make a formal 12    recommendation to the Department of Public Health on 13    whether to add the condition to the newborn screening 14    panel. If the Department approves the addition of the 15    condition, the Department must inform the State Laboratory 16    within 60 days of receiving the recommendation. The State 17    Laboratory shall implement newborn screening for the 18    approved conditions within 2 years. If the Department does 19    not approve the condition, the Department must provide 20    information as to why the decision was made and what gaps 21    of information are needed for reconsideration.22        (4) Submit to the Governor's Office and the General 23    Assembly by December 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, a 24    list of the conditions the Committee reviewed, the 25    Committee's recommendations, the Department of Public 26    Health's decisions, and the status of implementation in   SB3049 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1    the lab. Any recommendations not to add a condition shall 2    include information from the Committee as to why the 3    decision was made, what gaps of information need to be met 4    for reconsideration along with processes to initiate 5    reconsideration.6        (5) (1) Advise the Department regarding issues 7    relevant to its Genetics Program.8        (6) (2) Advise the Department regarding optimal 9    laboratory methodologies for screening of the targeted 10    conditions. 11        (7) (3) Recommend to the Department consultants who 12    are qualified to diagnose a condition detected by 13    screening, provide management of care, and genetic 14    counseling for the family. 15        (8) (4) Monitor the incidence of each condition for 16    which newborn screening is done, evaluate the effects of 17    treatment and genetic counseling, and provide advice on 18    disorders to be included in newborn screening panel. 19        (9) (5) Advise the Department on educational programs 20    for professionals and the general public. 21        (10) (6) Advise the Department on new developments and 22    areas of interest in relation to the Genetics Program.23        (11) (7) Address any other matters Any other matter 24    deemed appropriate by the Committee and the Director.25    (b-5) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 26prevent the review and recommendation of additional conditions   SB3049 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16764 BDA 32796 b1not currently on the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel. 2    (c) The Committee shall consist of 20 members appointed by 3the Director of Public Health. Membership shall include 4physicians, geneticists, nurses, nutritionists, and other 5allied health professionals, as well as patients and parents. 6Ex officio Ex-officio members may be appointed, but shall not 7have voting privileges.8    (d) Members of the Committee may receive compensation for 9necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their 10duties. 11(Source: P.A. 98-440, eff. 8-16-13.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.